Utah statutes.
26-4-7.   Custody by medical examiner.

Upon notification under Section 26-4-8 or investigation by the medical examiner's office, the medical examiner shall assume custody of a deceased body if it appears that death was:

(1)  by violence, gunshot, suicide, or accident unless the accident is a highway accident.  If the death was from a highway accident, custody shall only be assumed if an autopsy is required or permitted under the provisions of Section 26-4-13 or if requested by the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the highway accident;

(2)  sudden death while in apparent good health;

(3)  unattended deaths, except that an autopsy may only be performed in accordance with the provisions of Subsection 26-4-9(3);

(4)  under suspicious or unusual circumstances;

(5)  resulting from poisoning or overdose of drugs;

(6)  resulting from diseases that may constitute a threat to the public health;

(7)  resulting from disease, injury, toxic effect, or unusual exertion incurred within the scope of the decedent's employment;

(8)  due to sudden infant death syndrome;

(9)  resulting while the decedent was in prison, jail, police custody, the state hospital, or in a detention or medical facility operated for the treatment of persons with a mental illness, persons who are emotionally disturbed, or delinquent persons;

(10)  associated with diagnostic or therapeutic procedures; or

(11)  described in this section when request is made to assume custody by a county or district attorney or law enforcement agency in connection with a potential homicide investigation or prosecution.

